Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB469.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband,
wife, son, and daughter.
(2) A person shall only be eligible for membership on a board of education if the
person:
(a) Has been at the time of his or her election or appointment certified by the
Kentucky Department of Education in accordance with Section 2 of this
Act;
(b) Has attained the age of twenty-four (24) years;
(c)[(b)] Has been a citizen of Kentucky for at least three (3) years preceding the
election and is a voter of the district for which he or she is elected;
(d)[(c)] Has completed at least the twelfth grade or has been issued a High
School Equivalency Diploma[, as evidenced by:
1. An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury certifying completion of the
twelfth grade or the equivalent that has been filed with the nominating
petition required by KRS 118.315; or
2. A transcript evidencing completion of the twelfth grade or the results of
a twelfth grade equivalency examination that has been filed with the
nominating petition required by KRS 118.315];
(e) Is not ineligible for employment in the school district pursuant to KRS
160.380(5);
(f)[(d)] Does not hold any elective federal, state, county, or city office;
(g)[(e)] Is not, at the time of his or her election, directly or indirectly interested
in the sale to the board of books, stationery, or any other property, materials,
supplies, equipment, or services for which school funds are expended;
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
(h)[(f)] Has not been removed from membership on a board of education for
cause; and
(i)[(g)] Does not have a relative employed by the school district, in the case of a
person elected after July 13, 1990. This shall not apply to a board member
holding office on July 13, 1990, whose relative was not initially hired by the
district during the tenure of the board member.
(3) (a) A member of a board of education shall be subject to removal from office
pursuant to KRS 415.050 and 415.060 if, after the election the member:
1. Becomes interested in any contract with or claims against the board, of
the kind mentioned in subsection (2)(g)[(e)] of this section;
2. Moves his or her residence from the division for which he or she was
chosen;
3. Attempts to influence the employment of any school employee, except
the superintendent or school board attorney;
4. Is convicted of a felony;
5. Performs acts of malfeasance in performance of duties prescribed by
law;
6. Willfully misuses, converts, or misappropriates public property or funds;
or
7. Does anything that would render the member ineligible for reelection.
(b) In accordance with KRS 7.410, the Office of Education Accountability shall
have the duty and responsibility to investigate current local board of education
members for allegations of conduct prohibited by paragraph (a) of this
subsection. After review and investigation, the Office of Education
Accountability shall refer appropriate matters to the Attorney General.
(4) A member of a board of education shall be eligible for reelection unless he or she
becomes disqualified.
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
(5) The annual in-service training requirements for all members of boards of education
in office as of December 31, 2014, shall be as follows:
(a) Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to three (3) years of experience;
(b) Eight (8) hours for members with four (4) to seven (7) years of experience;
and
(c) Four (4) hours for members with eight (8) or more years of experience.
The Kentucky Board of Education shall identify the criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
(6) (a) For all members of boards of education who begin their initial service on or
after January 1, 2015, the in-service training requirements shall be:
1. Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training within
the first twelve (12) months of initial service and at least once
every four (4) years thereafter; and
2. Eight (8) hours for members with more than eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training at least
once every four (4) years.
(b) Training topics for members under this subsection with less than two (2) years
of consecutive service shall include three (3) hours of finance and one (1)
hour of superintendent evaluation within the first two (2) years of service. The
Kentucky Board of Education shall identify criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An unexpired certificate issued by the Kentucky Department of Education
certifying that the certificate holder meets the qualifications for office established
by subsection (2) of Section 1 of this Act shall be required before an individual:
(a) Appears as a named candidate for membership on a board of education in
any general election;
(b) Files a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for membership on a
board of education in accordance with KRS 117.265; or
(c) Is eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy on a board of education.
(2) Prior to the issuance of a certificate in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section, the department shall require the individual seeking certification to
submit:
(a) To a national and state criminal background check by the Department of
Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the cost of
which shall be paid by the individual;
(b) A clear CA/N check, as defined in KRS 160.380;
(c) Proof of completion of the twelfth grade as evidenced by:
1. An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury certifying completion of
the twelfth grade or the equivalent;
2. A transcript evidencing completion of the twelfth grade; or
3. The results of a twelfth grade equivalency examination that has been
filed with the nominating petition required by KRS 118.315; and
(d) Other documentation necessary to establish that the individual is eligible for
membership on a board of education under subsection (2)(b) to (i) of
Section 1 of this Act.
(3) Within thirty (30) days of an application for a certificate required in subsection
(1) of this section, the department shall either:
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
(a) Issue a certificate required in subsection (1) of this section if the:
1. Criminal background check required by subsection (2)(a) of this
section indicates that the individual has not been convicted of, and
does not have pending charges for, a criminal offense that would
make the individual ineligible for employment in the district pursuant
to KRS 160.380(5);
2. Individual has provided a clear CA/N check;
3. Individual has provided an affidavit or transcript evidencing
completion of the twelfth grade or results of a twelfth grade
equivalency examination;
4. Individual is eligible for membership on a board of education in
accordance with subsection (2)(b) to (i) of Section 1 of this Act; or
(b) Deny a certificate required in subsection (1) of this section if one (1) or
more of the qualifications identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection are
not met.
(4) A certificate issued under subsection (3) of this section shall expire one (1) year
from the date of issuance.
(5) Records collected by the department pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall be:
(a) Used for the sole purpose of determining an individual's qualification for
membership on a board of education pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 1
of this Act; and
(b) Excluded from the application of the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS
61.870 to 61.884.
Section 3. KRS 160.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any vacancy in any board of education shall be filled by a majority vote of the
remaining members of the local board within sixty (60) days after the vacancy
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
occurs. Within thirty (30) days of the vacancy, the local board shall, for two (2)
weeks, have solicited applications by posting a notice announcing the vacancy on
the district's website and by placing an advertisement in the newspaper of the
largest general circulation in the county. An applicant shall file a letter of intent
with the local board affirming that the applicant meets the eligibility requirements
as established by KRS 160.180[ and shall submit with the application a transcript
evidencing completion of the twelfth grade or results of a twelfth grade equivalency
examination]. After the two (2) weeks of advertisement on the district's website and
in the newspaper, the local board shall select from the applicants under this
subsection to fill the vacancy.
(2) If the local board fails to make an appointment under subsection (1) of this section,
then the chief state school officer shall fill the vacancy within sixty (60) days of the
failure.
(3) The member chosen under this section shall hold:
(a) An unexpired certificate issued by the Kentucky Department of Education
in accordance with Section 2 of this Act; and[Meet the eligibility
requirements as established by KRS 160.180 and shall ]
(b) [hold ]Office until his or her successor is elected or appointed, and has
qualified.
(4) Any vacancy having an unexpired term of one (1) year or more on August 1 after
the vacancy occurs shall be filled for the unexpired term by an election to be held at
the next regular election after the vacancy occurs. The elected member shall
succeed the member chosen under subsection (1) or (2) of this section to fill the
vacancy. Nominating petitions shall be filed with the county clerk not later than the
second Tuesday in August preceding the day for holding the regular election for the
unexpired term. Declarations of intent to be a write-in candidate shall be filed with
the county clerk in accordance with KRS 117.265.
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
(5) (a) If no candidate files a petition of nomination or declaration of intent to be a
write-in candidate to fill an unexpired term on a local board of education
under subsection (4) of this section, then a new vacancy shall exist on
November 1 and the vacancy shall be filled according to subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) If no candidate files a petition of nomination or declaration of intent to be a
write-in candidate for a new term on a local board of education opening
pursuant to KRS 118.315 and 118.365, then a vacancy shall exist on January 1
and the vacancy shall be filled according to subsection (1) of this section.
Section 4. KRS 117.265 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A voter may, at any regular or special election, cast a write-in vote for any person
qualified as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, whose name does not
appear upon the ballot for any office, by writing the name of his or her choice upon
the appropriate ballot for the office being voted on as required by KRS 117.125.
Any candidate who is defeated or disqualified in a partisan or nonpartisan primary
shall be ineligible as a candidate for the same office in the regular election, unless
there is a vacancy pursuant to KRS 118.105(3). Any voter utilizing a federal
provisional ballot, a federal provisional in-person absentee ballot, or a mail-in
absentee ballot for a regular or special election may write in a vote for any eligible
person whose name does not appear upon the ballot, by writing the name of his or
her choice under the office.
(2) Write-in votes shall be counted only for candidates for election to office who have
filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate with the Secretary of State or
county clerk, depending on the office being sought, on or before the certification
deadlines established in KRS 118.215(1)(a) to (c) and 118A.090(2) and not later
than the second Friday before the date of a special election. In the case of a special
election administered under KRS 118.730, a declaration of intent to be a write-in
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
candidate shall be filed at least twenty-eight (28) days before the day of the
election. The declaration of intent shall be filed no earlier than the first Wednesday
after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year the office will
appear on the ballot, and no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when
filed on the last date on which papers may be filed. The declaration of intent shall
be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State.
(3) A person shall not be eligible as a write-in candidate:
(a) For more than one (1) office in a regular or special election;[ or]
(b) If his or her name appears upon the ballot for any office, except that the
candidate may file a notice of withdrawal prior to filing an intent to be a
write-in candidate for office when a vacancy in a different office occurs
because of:
1. Death;
2. Disqualification to hold the office sought;
3. Severe disabling condition which arose after the nomination; or
4. The nomination of an unopposed candidate; or
(c) For membership on a board of education, unless he or she files an
unexpired certificate issued by the Department of Education in accordance
with Section 2 of this Act with his or her declaration of intent to be a write-
in candidate.
(4) Persons who wish to run for President and Vice President shall file a declaration of
intent to be a write-in candidate, along with a list of presidential electors pledged to
those candidates, with the Secretary of State on or before the fourth Friday in
October preceding the date of the regular election for those offices. The declaration
of intent shall be filed no earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in
November of the year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot, and no
later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
which papers may be filed. Write-in votes cast for the candidates whose names
appear on the ballot shall apply to the slate of pledged presidential electors, whose
names shall not appear on the ballot.
(5) The county clerk shall provide to the precinct election officers certified lists of
those persons who have filed declarations of intent as provided in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section. These lists shall not be posted anywhere, but a voter may
request to see a copy of the list. Once the voter has reviewed the copy, it shall
immediately be returned to the precinct election officer. Only write-in votes cast for
qualified candidates shall be counted.
(6) Two (2) election officers of opposing parties shall upon the request of any voter
instruct the voter on how to cast a write-in vote.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall adopt a code of ethics for members of
local boards of education. In developing the code of ethics, the Kentucky Board
of Education shall seek the input of members of local boards of education,
superintendents, school administrators, teachers, parents, and other education
stakeholders.
(2) A complaint alleging a violation of the code of ethics committed by a current
board member during the member's term of office shall be:
(a) Filed in writing with the Office of Education Accountability; and
(b) Be excluded from the application of the Kentucky Open Records Act unless
and until the board issues a public reprimand in accordance with subsection
(6)(a) of this section.
(3) The Office of Education Accountability shall investigate all complaints
containing an allegation of a violation of the code of ethics committed by a
current board member during the member's term office that include:
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
(a) The name and contact information of the individual that submitted the
complaint;
(b) The name of the board member alleged to have violated the code of ethics;
(c) The name of the school district where the board member serves; and
(d) A detailed description of the alleged facts underlying conduct that, if true,
would constitute a violation of the code of ethics.
(4) Upon opening an investigation of a complaint containing an allegation of a
violation of the code of ethics, the Office of Education Accountability shall notify
the board member who is the subject of the complaint. The board member shall
be entitled to submit a written rebuttal and supporting documentation.
(5) After an investigation, the Office of Education Accountability shall:
(a) Refer a complaint supported by substantiated evidence, and all relevant
documentation, to the Kentucky Board of Education; or
(b) Dismiss a complaint not supported by substantiated evidence and notify the
individual that submitted the complaint and the board member who is the
subject of the complaint of the dismissal.
(6) The Kentucky Board of Education shall review all complaints alleging a violation
of the code of ethics committed by a current board member and all relevant
documentation referred by the Office of Education Accountability in a closed
meeting. If the board determines that an allegation of a violation of the code of
ethics is:
(a) Supported by clear and convincing evidence, the board shall issue a written
public reprimand to the board member; or
(b) Not supported by clear and convincing evidence, the board shall dismiss the
complaint and notify the individual that submitted the complaint and the
board member who is the subject of the complaint of the dismissal.
(7) If the Kentucky Board of Education issues a written public reprimand to a board
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1593
member for a violation of the code of ethics pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this
section, a copy of the public reprimand and the written complaint shall be entered
into the minutes at the next regular meeting of the local board or education. The
name and contact information of the individual that submitted the complaint and
any other personally identifiable information of any victim, witness, or other
bystander that is not the subject of the complaint shall be redacted unless the
victim, witness, or other bystander waives that right.
(8) Within thirty (30) days from the date the public reprimand is issued, the board
member who is the subject of a public reprimand may issue a written response to
the public reprimand that shall be entered into the minutes of the next regular
meeting of the local board of education.
(9) At any time during the investigation or hearing processes, the Kentucky Board of
Education may enter into an agreed order with the board member who is the
subject of the public reprimands.
(10) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section by January 1, 2027.
Section 6. Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a)7. of Section 1 of this Act,
members serving on boards of education on the effective date of Section 1 of this Act
shall not be subject to removal from office on the basis of ineligibility for employment in
the school district pursuant to KRS 160.380(5) but shall not be eligible for reelection
unless certified by the Department of Education in accordance with Section 2 of this Act.
Section 7. Sections 1 to 4 of this Act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 1/21/2026 2:04 PM Jacketed